Illinois, session 104th, HB2797.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Sections 13-1, 13-2, 14-1, and 14-3.1 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/13-1)  (from Ch. 46, par. 13-1)7    Sec. 13-1. In counties not under township organization, 8the county board of commissioners shall at its meeting in July 9in each even-numbered year appoint in each election precinct 5 10capable and discreet persons meeting the qualifications of 11Section 13-4 to be judges of election. Where neither voting 12machines nor electronic, mechanical or electric voting systems 13are used, the county board may, for any precinct with respect 14to which the board considers such action necessary or 15desirable in view of the number of voters, and shall for 16general elections for any precinct containing more than 600 17registered voters, appoint in addition to the 5 judges of 18election a team of 5 tally judges. In such precincts the judges 19of election shall preside over the election during the hours 20the polls are open, and the tally judges, with the assistance 21of the holdover judges designated pursuant to Section 13-6.2, 22shall count the vote after the closing of the polls. However, 23the County Board of Commissioners may appoint 3 judges of   HB2797- 2 -LRB104 10456 SPS 20531 b1election to serve in lieu of the 5 judges of election otherwise 2required by this Section (1) to serve in any emergency 3referendum, or in any odd-year regular election or in any 4special primary or special election called for the purpose of 5filling a vacancy in the office of representative in the 6United States Congress or to nominate candidates for such 7purpose or (2) if the county board passes an ordinance to 8reduce the number of judges of election to 3 for primary 9elections. An election authority may also reduce the number of 10judges of election in each precinct to 3 judges of election in 11lieu of the 5 judges of election otherwise required by this 12Section. The tally judges shall possess the same 13qualifications and shall be appointed in the same manner and 14with the same division between political parties as is 15provided for judges of election.16    In addition to such precinct judges, the county board of 17commissioners shall appoint special panels of 3 judges each, 18who shall possess the same qualifications and shall be 19appointed in the same manner and with the same division 20between political parties as is provided for other judges of 21election. The number of such panels of judges required shall 22be determined by regulations of the State Board of Elections 23which shall base the required numbers of special panels on the 24number of registered voters in the jurisdiction or the number 25of vote by mail ballots voted at recent elections, or any 26combination of such factors.  HB2797- 3 -LRB104 10456 SPS 20531 b1    Such appointment shall be confirmed by the court as 2provided in Section 13-3 of this Article. No more than 3 3persons of the same political party shall be appointed judges 4of the same election precinct or election judge panel. The 5appointment shall be made in the following manner: The county 6board of commissioners shall select and approve 3 persons as 7judges of election in each election precinct from a certified 8list, furnished by the chair of the County Central Committee 9of the first leading political party in such precinct; and the 10county board of commissioners shall also select and approve 2 11persons as judges of election in each election precinct from a 12certified list, furnished by the chair of the County Central 13Committee of the second leading political party. However, if 14only 3 judges of election serve in each election precinct, no 15more than 2 persons of the same political party shall be judges 16of election in the same election precinct; and which political 17party is entitled to 2 judges of election and which political 18party is entitled to one judge of election shall be determined 19in the same manner as set forth in the next two preceding 20sentences with regard to 5 election judges in each precinct. 21Such certified list shall be filed with the county clerk not 22less than 10 days before the annual meeting of the county board 23of commissioners. Such list shall be arranged according to 24precincts. The chair of each county central committee shall, 25insofar as possible, list persons who reside within the 26precinct in which they are to serve as judges. However, he may,   HB2797- 4 -LRB104 10456 SPS 20531 b1in his sole discretion, submit the names of persons who reside 2outside the precinct but within the county embracing the 3precinct in which they are to serve. He must, however, submit 4the names of at least 2 residents of the precinct for each 5precinct in which his party is to have 3 judges and must submit 6the name of at least one resident of the precinct for each 7precinct in which his party is to have 2 judges. The county 8board of commissioners shall acknowledge in writing to each 9county chair the names of all persons submitted on such 10certified list and the total number of persons listed thereon. 11If no such list is filed or such list is incomplete (that is, 12no names or an insufficient number of names are furnished for 13certain election precincts), the county board of commissioners 14shall make or complete such list from the names contained in 15the supplemental list provided for in Section 13-1.1. The 16election judges shall hold their office for 2 years from their 17appointment, and until their successors are duly appointed in 18the manner provided in this Act. The county board of 19commissioners shall fill all vacancies in the office of judge 20of election at any time in the manner provided in this Act.21(Source: P.A. 100-337, eff. 8-25-17; 100-1027, eff. 1-1-19.) 22    (10 ILCS 5/13-2)  (from Ch. 46, par. 13-2)23    Sec. 13-2. In counties under the township organization the 24county board shall at its meeting in July in each 25even-numbered year except in counties containing a population   HB2797- 5 -LRB104 10456 SPS 20531 b1of 3,000,000 inhabitants or over and except when such judges 2are appointed by election commissioners, select in each 3election precinct in the county, 5 capable and discreet 4persons to be judges of election who shall possess the 5qualifications required by this Act for such judges. Where 6neither voting machines nor electronic, mechanical or electric 7voting systems are used, the county board may, for any 8precinct with respect to which the board considers such action 9necessary or desirable in view of the number of voters, and 10shall for general elections for any precinct containing more 11than 600 registered voters, appoint in addition to the 5 12judges of election a team of 5 tally judges. In such precincts 13the judges of election shall preside over the election during 14the hours the polls are open, and the tally judges, with the 15assistance of the holdover judges designated pursuant to 16Section 13-6.2, shall count the vote after the closing of the 17polls. The tally judges shall possess the same qualifications 18and shall be appointed in the same manner and with the same 19division between political parties as is provided for judges 20of election.21    However, the county board may appoint 3 judges of election 22to serve in lieu of the 5 judges of election otherwise required 23by this Section (1) to serve in any emergency referendum, or in 24any odd-year regular election or in any special primary or 25special election called for the purpose of filling a vacancy 26in the office of representative in the United States Congress   HB2797- 6 -LRB104 10456 SPS 20531 b1or to nominate candidates for such purpose or (2) if the county 2board passes an ordinance to reduce the number of judges of 3election to 3 for primary elections. An election authority may 4also reduce the number of judges of election in each precinct 5to 3 judges of election in lieu of the 5 judges of election 6otherwise required by this Section. 7    In addition to such precinct judges, the county board 8shall appoint special panels of 3 judges each, who shall 9possess the same qualifications and shall be appointed in the 10same manner and with the same division between political 11parties as is provided for other judges of election. The 12number of such panels of judges required shall be determined 13by regulations of the State Board of Elections, which shall 14base the required number of special panels on the number of 15registered voters in the jurisdiction or the number of 16absentee ballots voted at recent elections or any combination 17of such factors.18    No more than 3 persons of the same political party shall be 19appointed judges in the same election district or undivided 20precinct. The election of the judges of election in the 21various election precincts shall be made in the following 22manner: The county board shall select and approve 3 of the 23election judges in each precinct from a certified list 24furnished by the chair of the County Central Committee of the 25first leading political party in such election precinct and 26shall also select and approve 2 judges of election in each   HB2797- 7 -LRB104 10456 SPS 20531 b1election precinct from a certified list furnished by the chair 2of the County Central Committee of the second leading 3political party in such election precinct. However, if only 3 4judges of election serve in each election precinct, no more 5than 2 persons of the same political party shall be judges of 6election in the same election precinct; and which political 7party is entitled to 2 judges of election and which political 8party is entitled to one judge of election shall be determined 9in the same manner as set forth in the next two preceding 10sentences with regard to 5 election judges in each precinct. 11The respective County Central Committee chair shall notify the 12county board by June 1 of each odd-numbered year immediately 13preceding the annual meeting of the county board whether or 14not such certified list will be filed by such chair. Such list 15shall be arranged according to precincts. The chair of each 16county central committee shall, insofar as possible, list 17persons who reside within the precinct in which they are to 18serve as judges. However, he may, in his sole discretion, 19submit the names of persons who reside outside the precinct 20but within the county embracing the precinct in which they are 21to serve. He must, however, submit the names of at least 2 22residents of the precinct for each precinct in which his party 23is to have 3 judges and must submit the name of at least one 24resident of the precinct for each precinct in which his party 25is to have 2 judges. Such certified list, if filed, shall be 26filed with the county clerk not less than 20 days before the   HB2797- 8 -LRB104 10456 SPS 20531 b1annual meeting of the county board. The county board shall 2acknowledge in writing to each county chair the names of all 3persons submitted on such certified list and the total number 4of persons listed thereon. If no such list is filed or the list 5is incomplete (that is, no names or an insufficient number of 6names are furnished for certain election precincts), the 7county board shall make or complete such list from the names 8contained in the supplemental list provided for in Section 913-1.1. Provided, further, that in any case where a township 10has been or shall be redistricted, in whole or in part, 11subsequent to one general election for Governor, and prior to 12the next, the judges of election to be selected for all new or 13altered precincts shall be selected in that one of the methods 14above detailed, which shall be applicable according to the 15facts and circumstances of the particular case, but the 16majority of such judges for each such precinct shall be 17selected from the first leading political party, and the 18minority judges from the second leading political party. 19Provided, further, that in counties having a population of 203,000,000 inhabitants or over the selection of judges of 21election shall be made in the same manner in all respects as in 22other counties, except that the provisions relating to tally 23judges are inapplicable to such counties and except that the 24county board shall meet during the month of January for the 25purpose of making such selection, each township 26committeeperson shall assume the responsibilities given to the   HB2797- 9 -LRB104 10456 SPS 20531 b1chair of the county central committee in this Section for the 2precincts within his or her township, and the township 3committeeperson shall notify the county board by the preceding 4October 1 whether or not the certified list will be filed. Such 5judges of election shall hold their office for 2 years from 6their appointment and until their successors are duly 7appointed in the manner provided in this Act. The county board 8shall fill all vacancies in the office of judges of elections 9at any time in the manner herein provided.10    Such selections under this Section shall be confirmed by 11the circuit court as provided in Section 13-3 of this Article.12(Source: P.A. 100-337, eff. 8-25-17; 100-1027, eff. 1-1-19.) 13    (10 ILCS 5/14-1)  (from Ch. 46, par. 14-1)14    Sec. 14-1. (a) The board of election commissioners 15established or existing under Article 6 shall, at the time and 16in the manner provided in Section 14-3.1, select and choose no 17less than 3 5 persons, men or women, as judges of election for 18each precinct in such city, village or incorporated town. 19    Where neither voting machines nor electronic, mechanical 20or electric voting systems are used, the board of election 21commissioners may, for any precinct with respect to which the 22board considers such action necessary or desirable in view of 23the number of voters, and shall for general elections for any 24precinct containing more than 600 registered voters, appoint 25in addition to the 5 judges of election chosen under this   HB2797- 10 -LRB104 10456 SPS 20531 b1subsection a team of 5 tally judges. In such precincts the 2judges of election shall preside over the election during the 3hours the polls are open, and the tally judges, with the 4assistance of the holdover judges designated pursuant to 5Section 14-5.2, shall count the vote after the closing of the 6polls. The tally judges shall possess the same qualifications 7and shall be appointed in the same manner and with the same 8division between political parties as is provided for judges 9of election. The foregoing provisions relating to the 10appointment of tally judges are inapplicable in counties with 11a population of 1,000,000 or more. 12    (b) To qualify as judges the persons must: 13        (1) be citizens of the United States; 14        (2) be of good repute and character and not subject to 15    the registration requirement of the Sex Offender 16    Registration Act; 17        (3) be able to speak, read and write the English 18    language; 19        (4) be skilled in the 4 fundamental rules of 20    arithmetic; 21        (5) be of good understanding and capable; 22        (6) not be candidates for any office at the election 23    and not be elected committeepersons; 24        (7) reside and be entitled to vote in the precinct in 25    which they are selected to serve, except that in each 26    precinct not more than one judge of each party may be   HB2797- 11 -LRB104 10456 SPS 20531 b1    appointed from outside such precinct. Any judge so 2    appointed to serve in any precinct in which he is not 3    entitled to vote must be entitled to vote elsewhere within 4    the county which encompasses the precinct in which such 5    judge is appointed and such judge must otherwise meet the 6    qualifications of this Section, except as provided in 7    subsection (c) or (c-5). 8    (c) An election authority may establish a program to 9permit a person who is not entitled to vote to be appointed as 10an election judge if, as of the date of the election at which 11the person serves as a judge, he or she: 12        (1) is a U.S. citizen; 13        (2) is a junior or senior in good standing enrolled in 14    a public or private secondary school; 15        (3) has a cumulative grade point average equivalent to 16    at least 3.0 on a 4.0 scale; 17        (4) has the written approval of the principal of the 18    secondary school he or she attends at the time of 19    appointment; 20        (5) has the written approval of his or her parent or 21    legal guardian; 22        (6) has satisfactorily completed the training course 23    for judges of election described in Sections 13-2.1, 24    13-2.2, and 14-4.1; and 25        (7) meets all other qualifications for appointment and 26    service as an election judge.   HB2797- 12 -LRB104 10456 SPS 20531 b1    No more than one election judge qualifying under this 2subsection may serve per political party per precinct. Prior 3to appointment, a judge qualifying under this subsection must 4certify in writing to the election authority the political 5party the judge chooses to affiliate with. 6    Students appointed as election judges under this 7subsection shall not be counted as absent from school on the 8day they serve as judges. 9    (c-5) An election authority may establish a program to 10permit a person who is not entitled to vote in that precinct or 11county to be appointed as an election judge if, as of the date 12of the election at which the person serves as a judge, he or 13she:14        (1) is a U.S. citizen;15        (2) is currently enrolled in a community college, as 16    defined in the Public Community College Act, or a public 17    or private Illinois university or college;18        (3) has a cumulative grade point average equivalent to 19    at least 3.0 on a 4.0 scale;20        (4) has satisfactorily completed the training course 21    for judges of election described in Sections 13-2.1, 22    13-2.2, and 14-4.1; and23        (5) meets all other qualifications for appointment and 24    service as an election judge.25    No more than one election judge qualifying under this 26subsection may serve per political party per precinct. Prior   HB2797- 13 -LRB104 10456 SPS 20531 b1to appointment, a judge qualifying under this subsection must 2certify in writing to the election authority the political 3party the judge chooses to affiliate with.4    Students appointed as election judges under this 5subsection shall not be counted as absent from school on the 6day they serve as judges. 7    (d) The board of election commissioners may select 2 8additional judges of election, one from each of the major 9political parties, for each 200 voters in excess of 600 in any 10precinct having more than 600 voters as authorized by Section 1111-3. These additional judges must meet the qualifications 12prescribed in this Section. 13(Source: P.A. 100-1027, eff. 1-1-19.) 14    (10 ILCS 5/14-3.1)  (from Ch. 46, par. 14-3.1)15    Sec. 14-3.1. The board of election commissioners shall, 16during the month of July of each even-numbered year, select 17for each election precinct within the jurisdiction of the 18board 5 persons to be judges of election who shall possess the 19qualifications required by this Act for such judges. The 20selection shall be made by a county board of election 21commissioners in the following manner: the county board of 22election commissioners shall select and approve 3 persons as 23judges of election in each election precinct from a certified 24list furnished by the chair of the county central committee of 25the first leading political party in that precinct; the county   HB2797- 14 -LRB104 10456 SPS 20531 b1board of election commissioners also shall select and approve 22 persons as judges of election in each election precinct from 3a certified list furnished by the chair of the county central 4committee of the second leading political party in that 5precinct. The selection by a municipal board of election 6commissioners shall be made in the following manner: for each 7precinct, 3 judges shall be selected from one of the 2 leading 8political parties and the other 2 judges shall be selected 9from the other leading political party; the parties entitled 10to 3 and 2 judges, respectively, in the several precincts 11shall be determined as provided in Section 14-4. However, a 12Board of Election Commissioners may appoint 3 three judges of 13election to serve in lieu of the 5 judges of election otherwise 14required by this Section to serve in any emergency referendum, 15or in any odd-year regular election or in any special primary 16or special election called for the purpose of filling a 17vacancy in the office of representative in the United States 18Congress or to nominate candidates for such purpose. An 19election authority may also reduce the number of judges of 20election in each precinct to 3 judges of election in lieu of 21the 5 judges of election otherwise required by this Section. 22    If only 3 judges of election serve in each election 23precinct, no more than 2 persons of the same political party 24shall be judges of election in the same election precinct, and 25which political party is entitled to 2 judges of election and 26which political party is entitled to one judge of election   HB2797- 15 -LRB104 10456 SPS 20531 b1shall be determined as set forth in this Section for a county 2board of election commissioners' selection of 5 election 3judges in each precinct or in Section 14-4 for a municipal 4board of election commissioners' selection of election judges 5in each precinct, whichever is appropriate. In addition to 6such precinct judges, the board of election commissioners 7shall appoint special panels of 3 judges each, who shall 8possess the same qualifications and shall be appointed in the 9same manner and with the same division between political 10parties as is provided for other judges of election. The 11number of such panels of judges required shall be determined 12by regulation of the State Board of Elections, which shall 13base the required number of special panels on the number of 14registered voters in the jurisdiction or the number of 15absentee ballots voted at recent elections or any combination 16of such factors. A municipal board of election commissioners 17shall make the selections of persons qualified under Section 1814-1 from certified lists furnished by the chair of the 19respective county central committees, or each ward 20committeeperson in a municipality of 500,000 or more 21inhabitants, of the 2 leading political parties. Lists 22furnished by chairmen of county central committees or ward 23committeepersons, as the case may be, under this Section shall 24be arranged according to precincts. The chair of each county 25central committee or ward committeepersons, as the case may 26be, shall, insofar as possible, list persons who reside within   HB2797- 16 -LRB104 10456 SPS 20531 b1the precinct in which they are to serve as judges. However, he 2may, in his sole discretion, submit the names of persons who 3reside outside the precinct but within the county embracing 4the precinct in which they are to serve. He must, however, 5submit the names of at least 2 residents of the precinct for 6each precinct in which his party is to have 3 judges and must 7submit the name of at least one resident of the precinct for 8each precinct in which his party is to have 2 judges. The board 9of election commissioners shall no later than March 1 of each 10even-numbered year notify the chairmen of the respective 11county central committees or ward committeepersons, as the 12case may be, of their responsibility to furnish such lists, 13and each such chair shall furnish the board of election 14commissioners with the list for his party on or before May 1 of 15each even-numbered year. The board of election commissioners 16shall acknowledge in writing to each county chair or ward 17committeepersons, as the case may be, the names of all persons 18submitted on such certified list and the total number of 19persons listed thereon. If no such list is furnished or if no 20names or an insufficient number of names are furnished for 21certain precincts, the board of election commissioners shall 22make or complete such list from the names contained in the 23supplemental list provided for in Section 14-3.2. Judges of 24election shall hold their office for 2 years from their 25appointment and until their successors are duly appointed in 26the manner herein provided. The board of election   HB2797- 17 -LRB104 10456 SPS 20531 b1commissioners shall, subject to the provisions of Section 214-3.2, fill all vacancies in the office of judges of election 3at any time in the manner herein provided.4    Such selections under this Section shall be confirmed by 5the court as provided in Section 14-5.6(Source: P.A. 100-1027, eff. 1-1-19.)